th: ทิศทางการหมุนของเครื่องยนต์: หมุนทวนเข็มนาฬิกา; หมุนกลับทิศทางได้; หมุนตามมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
es: Dirección de giro del motor: Contrarrotativo; Reversible; Rotación estándar; Otra
zh-CN: 发动机旋转方向: 反向旋转; 可逆旋转; 标准旋转; 其他
ja: エンジンの回転方向: 逆回転; 可逆; 標準回転; その他
hu: Motor forgásiránya: Ellentétes forgásirányú; Változtatható forgásirányú; Szabványos forgásirány; Egyéb
tr: Motor dönüş yönü: Ters dönüşlü; Tersine çevrilebilir; Standart dönüş; Diğer
cs: Směr otáčení motoru: Opačný směr otáčení; Obousměrný; Standardní směr otáčení; Jiné
ro-RO: Direcția de rotație a motorului: Rotație inversă; Reversibil; Rotație standard; Altele
sl-SI: Smer vrtenja motorja: Nasprotno vrtenje; Reverzibilna; Standardna smer; Drugo
it: Direzione di rotazione del motore: Controrotante; Reversibile; Rotazione standard; Altro
de: Drehrichtung des Motors: Gegenläufig; Umkehrbar; Standarddrehrichtung; Sonstige
vi: Hướng quay của động cơ: Quay ngược; Có thể đảo chiều; Quay tiêu chuẩn; Khác
nl: Motor draairichting: Tegenroterend; Omkeerbaar; Standaard rotatie; Overig
fr: Sens de rotation du moteur: Contre-rotatif; Réversible; Rotation standard; Autre
nb: Motorens rotasjonsretning: Motroterende; Reversibel; Standard rotasjon; Annet
en: Engine rotation direction: Counter-rotating; Reversible; Standard rotation; Other
ru: Направление вращения двигателя: Встречное вращение; Реверсивное; Стандартное вращение; Другое
sk-SK: Smer otáčania motora: Protibežné; Obojsmerné; Štandardné otáčanie; Iné
pt-BR: Sentido de rotação do motor: Rotação inversa; Reversível; Rotação padrão; Outro
zh-TW: 引擎旋轉方向: 逆時針旋轉; 可逆轉; 標準旋轉; 其他
ko: 엔진 회전 방향: 역회전; 양방향 회전; 표준 회전; 기타
bg-BG: Посока на въртене на двигателя: Срещуположно въртящ се; Реверсивна; Стандартна ротация; Друго
da: Motorens rotationsretning: Modsat roterende; Vendbar; Standardrotation; Andet
pt-PT: sentido de rotação do motor: Rotação inversa; Reversível; Rotação padrão; Outro
hr-HR: Smjer rotacije motora: Proturotirajući; Reverzibilni; Standardna rotacija; Ostalo
sv: Motorns rotationsriktning: Motroterande; Reversibel; Standardrotation; Annat
fi: Moottorin pyörimissuunta: Vastapäivään; Vaihdettava suunta; Vakiopyörimissuunta; Muu
el: Κατεύθυνση περιστροφής κινητήρα: Αντίστροφης περιστροφής; Αναστρέψιμης περιστροφής; Τυπικής περιστροφής; Άλλο
lt-LT: Variklio sukimosi kryptis: Priešpriešinis sukimasis; Reversinė; Standartinis sukimasis; Kita
pl: Kierunek obrotu silnika: Przeciwbieżny; Odwracalny; Standardowy kierunek obrotów; Inne